Hawaii statutes.
§302D-16 Performance framework. (a)
The performance provisions within the charter contract shall be based on a
performance framework that clearly sets forth the academic, financial,
organizational, and operational performance indicators, measures, and metrics
that will guide the authorizer's evaluations of each public charter school.
The performance framework, as established by the authorizer, shall include
indicators, measures, and metrics for, at a minimum:

(1) Student academic proficiency;

(2) Student academic growth;

(3) Achievement gaps in proficiency and growth
between major student subgroups;

(4) Attendance;

(5) Enrollment variance;

(6) Postsecondary readiness, as applicable for high
schools;

(7) Financial performance and sustainability;

(8) Performance and stewardship, including compliance
with all applicable laws, rules, and terms of the charter contract; and

(9) Organizational viability.

(b) Annual academic performance targets shall
be set by each public charter school in conjunction with its authorizer, and
shall be designed to track each school in meeting applicable federal, state,
and authorizer expectations.

(c) The performance framework shall allow the
inclusion of additional rigorous, valid, and reliable indicators proposed by a
public charter school to augment external evaluations of its performance;
provided that the authorizer approves the quality and rigor of such
school-proposed indicators, and the indicators are consistent with the purposes
of this chapter and the charter contract.

(d) The performance framework shall require
the disaggregation of all student performance data by major student subgroups.

(e) For each public charter school it
oversees, the authorizer shall be responsible for verifying and either
maintaining or having access to all charter school data upon which the
performance framework relies.

(f) Multiple schools overseen by a single
governing board shall be required to report their performance as separate,
individual charter schools, and each charter school shall be held independently
accountable for its performance. [L 2012, c 130, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 159,
§11; am L 2014, c 99, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next